Utah statutes.
78B-15-113.   Parent-time rights of father.

(1)  If the tribunal determines that the alleged father is the father, it may upon its own motion or upon motion of the father, order parent-time rights in accordance with Sections 30-3-32 through 30-3-37 as it considers appropriate under the circumstances.

(2)  Parent-time rights may not be granted to a father if the child has been subsequently adopted.

